Hawaii statutes.
§171-56 Contract or license for concessions
or concession space. The board of land and natural resources may, subject
to chapter 102, dispose of concessions, as defined in chapter 102, and shall
enter into contracts or issue licenses for such concessions; provided that the
duration of the contract or license shall be related to the investment
required, but in no event to exceed fifteen years. [L 1962, c 32, pt of §2; am
L 1963, c 93, §4; Supp, §103A-53; am L 1967, c 189, §5; HRS §171-56]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next